Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.145

Building inspections—Authority of chief of the Washington state patrol.

Inspections of nursing homes by local authorities shall be consistent with the requirements of chapter 19.27 RCW, the state building code. Findings of a serious nature shall be coordinated with the department and the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, for determination of appropriate actions to ensure a safe environment for nursing home residents. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall have exclusive authority to determine appropriate corrective action under this section.

[ 1995 c 369 s 7; 1986 c 266 s 84; 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 45; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Effective dates—1983 1st ex.s. c 67: See note following RCW 74.46.475.

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.

Conflict with federal requirements and this section: RCW 74.46.840.